Utah statutes.
77-32a-14.   Verified statement of time and expenses of counsel for indigent defendants.

The court may require a verified statement of time and expenses from appointed counsel or the nonprofit legal aid or other association providing counsel to convicted indigent defendants in order to establish the costs, if any, which will be included in the judgment.

